











































The Block - Whitepaper v0.4d.cdr


E-COMMERCE REDEFINED

LAST REVISION: OCTOBER 12, 2017

FULLY DECENTRALISED MARKETPLACE POWERED BY THE ETHEREUM BLOCKCHAIN

W H I T E P A P E R

THE



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sTA BL E OF CO N TEN TST H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

TABLE OF CONTENTS

1. SUMMARY

2. BITBOOST

 2.1 Introduction to BitBoost

 2.2 BitBoost's contribution to e-commerce 2.0

3. THE BLOCK

 3.1 Overview

 3.2 Privacy features

 3.3 Escrow and arbitration

 3.4 Other key features

 3.5 Not another darknet market

 3.6 Technical description

 3.7 Technical roadmap

4. THE LANDSCAPE

 4.1 The e-commerce market

 4.2 Competitive environment

5. BUSINESS MODEL

 5.1 Overview

 5.2 Business strategy

 5.3 Product promotion

 5.4 Funds roadmap

6. THE TOKEN

 6.1 Token supply and specifications

 6.2 Main token sale structure

  6.3 Allocation of funding

7. CONCLUSION

8. THE TEAM

9. DISCLAIMER

ANNEX

LIST OF EXHIBITS

REFERENCES

..................................................................................................................................................  01

.................................................................................................................  02

...............................................................................  03

.............................................................................................................................................  06

.................................................................................................................................  07

....................................................................................................................  08

...........................................................................................................................  09

.........................................................................................................  11

.......................................................................................................................  13

...........................................................................................................................  16

................................................................................................................  17

...............................................................................................................  22

..............................................................................................................................................  26

..............................................................................................................................  28

...........................................................................................................................  30

.................................................................................................................................  31

...................................................................................................  32

...............................................................................................................  33

........................................................................................................................  34

...........................................................................................................................................  35

..................................................................................................................................................  36

..............................................................................................................................................  40

  ............................................................................................................................................................  41

..............................................................................................................................  EXHIBITS

..............................................................................................................................  REFERENCES



The blockchain software company BitBoost was formed with the explicit purpose of developing 

a decentralised marketplace. BitBoost is launching its application «The Block», which is a 

decentralized e-commerce platform based on the Ethereum blockchain's smart contracts protocol. 

The Block recreates the global infrastructure of major e-commerce corporations, such as eBay and 

Amazon, entirely in code.

Due to its decentralised nature, The Block offers significant advantages over traditional, 

centralised e-commerce platforms and opens up the rapidly growing marketplace to new business 

and user segments. It allows anyone to list items for sale, to set up a store, or to make a purchase. At 

the same time, The Block contains powerful tools to facilitate both the user experience and to 

protect customers and merchants. These tools include instant search, escrow, and customisable 

filters to screen items illegal in certain jurisdictions. A reputation system is under development. 

Centralization has been removed from the trading process – allowing for radically lower fees, a high 

degree of privacy, and zero censorship.

Users can download The Block as a standalone app that accesses the Ethereum network via 

either the developers' nodes or a local copy of the blockchain. All payments are made in 

cryptocurrency, principally in ether (ETH), which can be held in an integrated wallet for convenience 

or, if preferred, in an external wallet. Ether is a popular and highly liquid cryptocurrency that offers 

the functionality required for fast customer-to-customer transactions on The Block. Payment 

processing services including ShapeShift – and later also fiat-to-crypto services – will be used to 

ensure user-friendliness. 

The Block is a fully decentralised e-commerce marketplace where everyone can buy and sell 

goods, and benefit from the significant advantages of the platform's design and technical properties: 

privacy, freedom, and much lower costs.

1. SUMMARY

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /431T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER



2. BITBOOST

2.1 INTRODUCTION TO BITBOOST

BitBoost has the aspiration to enable truly free trade on a global scale. The company envisions 

a global economy in which all participants can conduct business with each other peacefully, 

privately, and efficiently, regardless of their location and without interference, censorship, or 

prohibitively high fees. The Ethereum blockchain enables the realisation of this vision. BitBoost is 

made up of a team of highly committed individuals with different backgrounds and careers, all of 

which have led them to blockchain technology. Some team members are developers who have 

worked with JavaScript, Angular, and other languages. Others have a background in trading on the 

diverse cryptocurrency markets.

The BitBoost team first met within the community of the blockchain platform NXT, and built its 

first marketplace – NXT FreeMarket, a downloadable, functional shipping app – on the NXT 

blockchain. However, the limitations of the NXT blockchain for a marketplace quickly became 

apparent and the user base was limited from the outset. As a result, the team decided to move to 

the Ethereum blockchain.

Due to its advanced technical features the Ethereum platform is ideally suited for The Block 

application. In contrast to the NXT blockchain, on Ethereum every item is represented by a smart 

contract that can be updated directly and queried for its current status. Escrow is also handled 

effectively by using smart contracts – a far superior solution. At the same time, BitBoost recognises 

the non-technical challenges of a decentralised marketplace to user adoption, such as the 

requirement to localise The Block in many different languages, and to tailor and adapt it for the 

needs of widely varying legal jurisdictions.

All team members believe in the founding ideals of Bitcoin and blockchain technology and, 

therefore, strive to redefine e-commerce as a free, efficient, and above all private endeavour in the 

globally connected 21st century.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /432T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /433T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

2.2 BITBOOST’S CONTRIBUTION TO E-COMMERCE 2.0

Enabling e-commerce platforms to thrive has been one of the main successes of the internet, 

by bringing a broader array of goods at cheaper prices to a much larger number of potential 

consumers. In addition, ease of use and the consumers' ability to share almost instant feedback on 

the goods purchased are significant advantages.

But certain fundamental aspects of today's e-commerce market should be improved. They are 

rooted in the nature of our monetary system and the need for centralised parties to handle the 

payment transactions. By essentially recreating the infrastructure of an e-commerce store using 

smart contracts, The Block intends to raise e-commerce to a higher level by eliminating these 

disadvantages and making the e-commerce market more efficient.

Centralization of the money supply

For the overwhelming majority of history, money has been a physical commodity of one sort or 

another that was handled in person and used in «peer-to-peer» transactions. Money, as we formally 

recognise it today, probably arose around 7,000 years ago in the Sumerian temple complexes. At the 

beginning, money was entirely decentralised; the parties to a transaction would weigh out the 

(typically) silver pieces at the point of transaction, testing the metal with a touchstone to establish 

purity. The inconvenience of this approach was mitigated by its complete independence from 

outside control and interference. Centralisation of the money supply arose in the 6th century BC, 

with the development of the first coinage. At that point, money came under the control of the state 

and has remained so ever since. Further centralisation occurred through the rise of the banking 

system, particularly during the Renaissance period under the Medici family. Nevertheless, money 

was still backed by a physical commodity.

Two factors have fundamentally changed the nature of money over the last century. The first is 

that it became severed from any tangible commodity with the introduction of «fiat» money in the 

aftermath of the Great Depression. While this enabled national economies to adjust and recover 

more quickly, it placed ultimate control over the creation of money in the hands of governments and 

central banks. The second factor is that our payment system has moved progressively into the 

electronic arena over the past 50 years. Today, the vast majority of payments are made online.

Control over the payments system

As money moved online, it could no longer remain a peer-to-peer system. Because data are 

easy to copy, it was impossible to ensure that electronic money was only spent once. Trusted 

authorities were required to keep accounts and make sure that transactions were not fraudulent. 

This became one of the roles of banks, credit card companies, and payment processors such as 

PayPal in the financial system. Any online payments required centralisation for accounting purposes, 

which also entailed trust.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /434T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Unfortunately, this trust can be and is routinely abused, whether as a matter of policy or 

incidentally. Payment processors act as an intermediary between the parties of a transaction and 

can block or reverse a transfer. This has benefits for customers who have experienced identity theft, 

but there are implications for merchants, who can be hit with chargebacks. For example, eBay 

routinely sides with customers in such disputes, unfairly impacting sellers.

Risk of inappropriate surveillance

The fact that third parties are required for online purchases opens the door for surveillance,

since there is always someone who holds financial information that can be leveraged in one 

way or another. This is the case for both customers and merchants, both of whom require payment 

processing facilities such as PayPal or credit card companies.

Additionally, the platform used for the sale itself (e.g. eBay or Amazon) will collect further 

information and will likely host the products and stores of thousands of merchants. The involvement 

of these third parties has eroded the privacy we enjoyed in the case of simple cash transactions. Our 

online footprint is tracked, analysed, and monetised at every turn, with personal data sold to the 

highest bidder. Even when we consent to this (tacitly or explicitly), and even when it is used for 

legitimate purposes, these data are attractive for a wide range of purposes and are frequently 

stolen, leaked, or sold to malicious entities.

BitBoost improves the e-commerce market

BitBoost intends to address these deficiencies with the creation of a decentralised e-commerce 

platform built on Ethereum. The Block will implement smart contracts to provide an e-commerce 

infrastructure and use cryptocurrency for customer purchases and merchant listing fees. By using 

smart contracts for the creation of the online store and Ethereum's native currency, ether (ETH), as 

The Block's own currency, the project eliminates the need for third parties that have previously been 

essential to hosting and payment processing.

One important consequence of its decentralised design is that The Block will further enhance 

user privacy. Not only can cryptocurrency payments offer a strong element of privacy, but there will 

be no third parties collecting user data. The Block itself does not need any personal data, working in 

a permissionless manner and performing no monitoring. A user needs only The Block application 

and a small amount of ETH to get started and operate within the Ethereum blockchain.

E-commerce giants like Amazon and eBay depend upon extensive server farms to host their 

websites and to deal with traffic. Although this approach offers efficiencies when compared to the 

traditional use of physical stores, it still has substantial costs attached to it. By using Ethereum, The 

Block replaces these enormous and expensive data centres with code. The overhead of running a 

global e-commerce store is eliminated – or, more accurately, distributed among the Ethereum 

miners who are paid for maintaining the network. BitBoost essentially recreates the infrastructure of 

an e-commerce store using smart contracts and is therefore in a position to pass on the savings to 

The Block's users in the form of extremely low fees.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /435T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

How can the e-commerce industry navigate around these challenges and gain access to this 

untapped potential? What are the available technologies that can lead to financial inclusion, change 

trading habits, and create new exchange dynamics? We, at BitBoost, believe blockchain technology 

and cryptocurrencies may achieve all of that. While multiple options exist in the cryptocurrencies 

market space, The Block simplifies the overall experience from the points of view of both the buyer 

and seller:

· First, its clean and intuitive interface will be familiar to anymore who shops online. The 

presence of a managed escrow system and the integration of The Block's Ethereum wallet with 

ShapeShift are just two of the features that will facilitate wide adoption. 

· The Block has placed a lot of emphasis on privacy, allowing transactions to take place in a 

completely automated and secure way. 

· As a decentralised platform with all listings held on the blockchain, The Block never goes 

offline and there is no single point of failure.

Third-party application integration will be added in time, with the goal of creating a full-fledged 

ecosystem which prepares a new generation of users for e-commerce 2.0.

Exhibit 1: The financially excluded
Financially excluded population in emerging economies

53 54 56
238

(21%)
China

49 54 23
214

(46%)
Latin 

America

47 54 41
154

(39%)

Eastern EU

and Central

Asia

Number of financially excluded
Millions (% of adult population) Poor Women Rural

45 57 71
642

(53%)
South Asia

45 54 61
467

(61%)
Africa and

Middle East

49 49 59
266

(59%)
Southeast

Asia

% share of financially excluded population

Special topic: the market potential of the «un-banked» 

Existing e-commerce models work well in countries that have a good digital infrastructure and 

monetary stability. But what about the two billion people who live in countries which do not provide 

such infrastructure, where there is no monetary stability, or who are otherwise excluded from access 

to a stable environment for financial transactions? In other words: what about the «un-banked» 

people of the world?



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /436T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

3. THE BLOCK

3.1 OVERVIEW

The Block is a completely new kind of blockchain-based e-commerce application with the 

advantages of a decentralised architecture. It must both compete with popular online shopping sites 

and prevail against existing monetary and payment systems. While technical features are key to 

maintain its advantages of privacy, freedom, and cost, user experience is the driving force to ensure 

its broad appeal. Therefore, it has a simple, user-friendly interface that is free from advertisements.

 

The Block takes the form of a downloadable app, rather than a website. This is critical because it 

means that the software is accessible from every user's personal computer, and there is no single 

point of failure, as there would be with a hosted website. No blockchain download is required. 

Although, a user operating on a local copy of the blockchain can use The Block offline. In that case, 

transactions will not be processed until the user is online again. The app is available for Windows, 

macOS, and Linux. Mobile app versions for iOS and Android are currently under development. Our 

web version is already in alpha. This will be accessible through Status.im, which will increase our user 

traffic and adoption rate. As The Block is intended for global commerce, it will be launched in 20 

languages, with further languages to be added in the future.

 

Ether (ETH) is the «gas» that powers the Ethereum blockchain on which The Block is built, and it 

is also The Block's native currency. Ether is used for making payments between customers and 

merchants, and items for sale are listed at a price quoted in ETH. The buyer pays in ether, and the 

vendor receives ether as payment – ensuring the most frictionless solution for internal payments. 

The users may convert ether to other currencies at their own discretion.

 

The Block includes an internal wallet for every user. All payments for goods and services are 

made in ether from this wallet because the respective funds need to be withdrawn and sent to an 

escrow contract at the time of purchase. The internal wallet can be funded from either an external 

ether wallet or from within The Block's interface via ShapeShift . At present, this [www.shapeshift.io]

requires Bitcoin (BTC) or other cryptocurrencies, but a solution is planned for converting national 

currencies such as US dollars or euros directly into ether. Funds can be withdrawn from the internal 

wallet anytime and be sent to an exchange or external address. The internal wallet is fully 

decentralised, and any ether stored there remain in the user's control. The wallet is secured with a 

user-generated passphrase that must be created before the app can be used. Support for multiple 

wallets within the app is planned.

https://shapeshift.io


3.2 PRIVACY FEATURES

One of the main reasons for the creation of The Block is the inherent lack of privacy on 

traditional e-commerce platforms. The Block offers different levels of privacy and protects the 

privacy of users who want to remain safe. At the same time, BitBoost offers no support to the sale of 

illegal items. As a decentralised protocol, The Block will be available in many different jurisdictions. 

Before a user is granted access to The Block's functionality, they must first agree to the terms of 

service, which require that all users act in accordance with the laws of their jurisdictions. Compliance 

with local laws is the individual's own responsibility.

Concern for the users' privacy and the ability to trade freely are built into every element of The 

Block. This is reflected in numerous features:

Spam email prevention

E-commerce companies collect their customers' email addresses, which are used for the

registration process and to administrate their accounts. This email database represents a 

substantial marketing resource, and emails announcing deals, discounts, or invitations to return to 

the site are sent out with intense frequency. Most of these emails are unsolicited and unwanted. The 

Block does not require any personal information from buyers or sellers. BitBoost will not send any 

advertisements to its users as a matter of policy.

Ethereum nodes

Users can connect to the Ethereum network by using a local copy of the blockchain or by

connecting to one of the nodes maintained by the BitBoost team. The former requires 

additional time, storage space, and bandwidth. This will be applicable mainly for existing Ethereum 

node runners but also those for whom privacy is particularly important. The latter option is more 

appropriate when a complete download of the Ethereum blockchain is not possible or desirable, or 

when the user's machine is not online at all times.

Account creation

Creating a new identity to use The Block is a simple process. The Block does not require any 

information that could be used to identify buyers and sellers. Both merchants and customers can 

set up accounts for free, and no advertising or in-app purchases exist. In the future, the user will be 

able to choose an alias for The Block. This is a string of characters and could even be an Ethereum 

address.

Encrypted messaging

During the purchase process, encrypted messages can be included with the transaction. The 

buyer's address and details about the shipping method are stored as an encrypted message on the 

blockchain. When the seller approves or declines a sale, he or she has the option to send an 

encrypted message with additional information to the buyer. Messages required by the purchase 

process are stored on the blockchain, whereas encrypted chat facilities are provided off-blockchain. 

Chat facilities require initial registration, but can be used without logging in.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /437T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER



3.3 ESCROW AND ARBITRATION

Existing e-commerce platforms require centralised payment systems to process transactions, 

such as PayPal. In the event of a dispute, customers or merchants can appeal for arbitration to those 

companies. On a decentralised platform, such a solution is not possible. Based on smart contracts, 

BitBoost has developed a new approach to escrow.

 The option of arbitration, in the case of a dispute between buyer and seller, will be included 

in The Block. A seller may optionally name an arbiter in an item listing. Payment for the item is held 

in an escrow contract and will be only released to the seller if both parties indicate that they are 

satisfied, or if a given period of time has passed without the buyer having opened a dispute. If a 

dispute is opened, the designated arbiter will be granted control over the escrowed funds and must 

determine whether they should be returned to the buyer, transferred to the seller, or to both in 

some ratio. The arbiter may request a fee for this service. Over time, some arbiters will gain a 

positive reputation for their impartial service and fairness. All communication between buyer and 

seller is encrypted using the session key, which is generated when a buyer purchases an item. This 

session key is encrypted with the buyer's private key and the seller's public key using elliptic 

curve25519 encryption. If required, the session key can be shared with the arbiter so that he or she 

can access the encrypted communication.

 A transaction on The Block consists of four parties: the seller, the buyer, the arbiter, and the 

escrow contract. The seller may choose the arbiter when he lists the item. Arbiters will set their own 

fees for their service, either a fixed price or a percentage of the item's selling price. The arbiters also 

determine whether the fee is only charged in the case of a dispute or if it is due regardless of any 

use of the arbitration service.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /438T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Image hosting

BitBoost has developed a system to automate private image hosting. Images are an important 

part of online commerce, and private image hosting is a critical requirement for a truly private 

marketplace. As part of the listing process, merchants can upload images from their hard drive to a 

private image hosting service  without leaving The Block. The service is free of [https://imgur.com]

charge.

HTTPS and private key encryption

The Block uses HTTPS exclusively for all external services such as the ETH/BTC exchange,

exchange rate queries, and image uploading. Tor integration is planned. Private keys are stored 

encrypted, using AES-128 encryption together with a salt and 10,000 rounds of SHA-256 hashing.

https://imgur.com
https://imgur.com


Example for arbitration

The following sequence illustrates arbitration on The Block:

· The seller creates a listing and chooses an arbiter who has set a fee of $5 in ether, to be 

charged only in the case of a dispute. At this point, the arbiter does not get paid.

· The buyer buys an item. Money moves from the wallet to the escrow contract.

· The seller ships the item to the buyer and indicates to the escrow contract that he or she has 

completed their part of the sale.

· The buyer receives the item.

· At this point, the buyer can finalise the sale or open a dispute. If the sale is finalised, then the 

money moves from the escrow contract to the seller. The transaction is settled, the arbiter does not 

get paid.

If the buyer opens a dispute, two things can happen:

  1) The seller agrees with the dispute, and the money moves from the escrow contract

back to the buyer's wallet. The arbiter does not get paid.

  2) The seller also wants to open a dispute. In order to do so, the seller pays $5 in

ether to the arbiter from the escrowed funds.

· At this point, the arbiter gains control of the escrowed money, and he can send the money 

only to the buyer, or only to the seller, or to both in a ratio that he or she chooses.

The arbiter only gets paid if both parties dispute the transaction. In that case, the seller pays 

the arbiter out of the escrowed funds. If there is no dispute, the arbiter does not get paid, and 

choosing an arbiter was free for the seller. For the buyer, opening a dispute and arbitration always is 

free of charge.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /439T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Reputation system

In addition to the arbitration service, The Block will offer its users protection through a 

reputation system. Every seller and buyer will have a reputation rating derived from their conduct 

and the quality of their products during and after every transaction. Users with a low or negative 

reputation score may be filtered out, in order to protect all sellers and buyers from fraud and wasted 

time. This reputation system is currently under development and will encourage legitimate 

merchants and customers to act honestly and to build up a solid reputation.

A complication of reputations systems in general is how to handle Sybil attacks, when a 

dishonest user creates multiple accounts and pretends to be many satisfied buyers to increase the 

reputation of his original account, or hires people to pretend to they are satisfied buyers to 

artificially inflate his reputation. This is particularly a problem in decentralized systems because they 

don't require users to reveal their identity. Even eBay and Amazon, the giants of e-commerce, don't 

yet have a total solution for this. We are trying to deal with this through smart contracts. The 

technology is still new but we are hopeful that smart contracts will allow us to develop solutions that 

haven't been available before.

3.4 OTHER KEY FEATURES



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4310T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Filters

By The Block's design, censorship is not possible. Listings and transactions are written directly 

to the Ethereum blockchain, which is securely maintained by thousands of miners around the world. 

Item listings are not controlled, and neither the BitBoost team nor any third party can remove 

listings.

However, in the interest of providing a marketplace that is both censorship-free and attractive 

for all users, The Block will contain a filtering system. This system will not remove listed items from 

the blockchain, but it will enable users to filter out listings so that they are not displayed anymore.

 

The Block will include a basic filter, which will be maintained by the BitBoost team and which will 

be turned on by default. Users will also be able to subscribe to filters provided by third parties. 

These third parties are expected to offer such services for a variety of reasons: filtering illegal 

material in accordance with their respective jurisdictions, filtering morally objectionable items, or 

filtering for religious purposes. Filters that are tailored for different jurisdictions will help users to 

comply with local laws while maintaining access to the global market. But the choice to implement 

any filter will be left entirely to the individual user.

Instant search

Many e-commerce sites provide powerful instant-search tools to help customers find what they 

are looking for quickly, and to browse the site smoothly and easily. The Block offers the same. Buyers 

will be able to use a search engine-like functionality by simply entering the desired item. As they type, 

they will receive a constantly updating list of matching products in real time. 

To conduct a search, no login is needed, making it possible for everyone to browse The Block 

without registering. The chat function is only enabled after registering, but as it runs independently 

of Ethereum, it can be used without having to log in. Potential buyers can engage privately with 

merchants to ask questions and clarify sales policies, prices, and shipping.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4311T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Ongoing development and roadmap

The Block will remain under constant development for the foreseeable future. A series of new 

features is planned for inclusion in the platform, but the team also relies on the community to 

suggest new elements and improvements. The development roadmap is available on the BitBoost 

website . Upcoming features are announced on the BitBoost forum and new [www.BitBoost.net]

functionality may be requested in several ways: from within The Block application using the feedback 

tool, by making a new request on the forum, or by emailing BitBoost directly at 

feedback@bitboost.net.

Key features that are currently under development include:

· Internal reputation system,

· Tor integration,

· Pricing in national currencies and the purchase of ether and BitBoost tokens (see  chapter 5

«Business model» and chapter 6 «The Token») in fiat currencies, and the

· Encrypted version of the chat system.

The app is currently in beta testing. The development team welcomes feedback from both 

testers and end users after the initial launch. Regular releases of new beta versions will allow 

BitBoost to address any bugs discovered during this process as well as to integrate new features in 

response to suggestions and market needs.

The BitBoost team is well aware of public concern regarding darknet marketplaces. We wish to 

put any fears to rest concerning the presence of illegal activity on The Block. Simply put, we do not 

encourage or support it, and our platform does not provide a welcoming environment for darknet 

goods.

One of the most famous cases of the digital trafficking of illegal goods, and a source of 

hesitation for users contemplating new internet markets, is the Silk Road project. An uninformed 

user may equate good applications of decentralization, like personal privacy, with the potential for 

crime, but this is not the case at all, for several reasons.

For one thing, Silk Road was not built on a blockchain. It relied on Tor hidden services. Tor 

actually has two main functions. One is to provide services that cannot be tied to an IP address. This 

is what allowed Silk Road to engage in illegal activity for a time without getting caught. We have 

nothing to do with Tor hidden services and will never implement this feature. We will, however, take 

advantage of Tor's other function, which will give our users a secure way to connect to BitBoost's 

hosted Ethereum blockchain. This means our users can benefit from privacy but are not given an 

avenue for illegal activity.

3.5 NOT ANOTHER DARKNET MARKET

https://www.bitboost.net
mailto:feedback@bitboost.net


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4312T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

In fact, it's quite the opposite. The Ethereum blockchain is a public blockchain. All listings are 

available for anyone to see, including law enforcement. BitBoost will cooperate with local 

governments insofar as we are able. This is the same approach taken by Apple, the world's most 

valuable company. In this way, blockchain technology is a huge boon to law enforcement without 

compromising the privacy of good people just trying to make a living or buy a perfectly legal item.

 

Also, as a decentralized company, BitBoost encourages personal responsibility rather than 

reliance on a centralized agency for protection. We have already implemented three features in line 

with this idea. First, our previously mentioned Filter System will be in place before The Block moves 

to the Ethereum Live Net. So, users will have no involuntary contact with illegal items. They will even 

have the ability to create their own filters so that they can avoid items they just don't wish to see. 

Second, users must choose to turn off the built-in filter. 

Taking this action may expose them to items that, while perfectly legal in some areas, might not 

be legal in their jurisdiction. That is their personal choice. Lastly, sellers must toggle the Terms of 

Service checkbox before they can list any item. Among other things, this document states that the 

item being listed is not illegal in the seller's jurisdiction.



Advanced encryption standard (AES) is used for data encryption, and one-time private keys are 

generated for the purchase session. One-time keys allow the buyer and seller to share their 

communication with a third party, e.g. the arbiter, without revealing their private keys. The Block 

shares private keys for both encrypted communication and Ethereum wallet generation. The private 

key is stored in the user data folder in JSON format, encrypted with the user's password.

3.6 TECHNICAL DESCRIPTION

The Block utilizes Ethereum smart contracts to list items for sale, to organize the purchase and 

sales processes, to hold escrowed funds, and to allow communication between buyers and sellers. 

Smart contracts enable a transparent and safe trading process. Messages mandatory to the 

purchase process are stored encrypted on the blockchain. Non-mandatory and private 

communication can be moved to an off-blockchain platform to reduce costs and improve speed. As 

all data on the Ethereum blockchain are publicly visible, private communication requires encryption.

 

BitBoost does not use encryption to promote trade in illegal items or to foster a scam 

ecosystem, but reflects the lessons learned from the mass violations of privacy that have occurred in 

recent years. A decentralised, blockchain-based system is less prone to theft of personal 

information. But it needs strong cryptography to protect that data, since the data are exposed on 

the public blockchain.

 

The Block uses the elliptic curve Curve25519 for private-public keypair generation. On a high-

level summary, each Curve25519 user has a 32- byte secret key and a 32-byte public key. Each set of 

two Curve25519 users has a 32-byte shared secret used to authenticate and encrypt messages 

between the two users. For a more detailed, medium-level view, the following picture shows the data 

flow from secret keys through public keys to a shared secret.

Public string 9Alice’s secret key a Bob’s secret key b

Public function

Alice’s public key Bob’s public key

Curve25519(b,9)Curve25519(a,9)

{Alice,Bob}’s shared secret

Curve25519(a,Curve25519(b,9))

{Alice,Bob}’s shared secret

Curve25519(b,Curve25519(a,9))

Curve25519

Exhibit 2: Data flow

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4313T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER



Interestingly, AES performs all its computations on bytes rather than bits. Hence, AES treats the 

128 bits of a plaintext block as 16 bytes. These 16 bytes are arranged in four columns and four rows 

for processing as a matrix. In contrast to data encryption standard (DES), the number of rounds in 

AES is variable and depends on the length of the key. AES uses 10 rounds for 128-bit keys, 12 rounds 

for 192-bit keys, and 14 rounds for 256-bit keys. Each of these rounds uses a different 128-bit round 

key, which is calculated from the original AES key. The following illustration shows the schematic AES 

structure:

K0

K1

K2

KR

...
Pre-round

transformation

Round 1

Round 2

Round N
(slightly different)

...

Round keys
(128-bits)

128-bit plaintext

128-bit ciphertext

K
e

y
 e

x
p

a
n

si
o

n

Cypher key

(128, 192 or 256 bits)

Relationship between

number of rounds (R)

and cipher key size

10

12

14

128

192

256

R Key size

The store itself is a smart contract holding a list of events. Each event is a new listing. Anyone 

can add new listings to the store by paying the listing fee. Using events is a cheaper way of utilizing 

the smart contracts' publicly visible storage.

Each new listing is stored inside and corresponds to a separate smart contract. Events in the 

store only reference those contracts by the contract address. Each listing contract also stores a list 

of events representing the trade history of the item. Additionally, each item's contract provides 

escrow functionality and safely holds the funds until the purchase process is finished.

Exhibit 3: Schematic AES structure

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4314T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

The wallet management code is taken from myetherwallet source code: 

https://github.com/kvhnuke/etherwallet/blob/mercury/app/scripts/myetherwallet.js

https://github.com/kvhnuke/etherwallet/blob/mercury/app/scripts/myetherwallet.js


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4315T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

The Block application fetches a store events list, gets a list of item addresses, checks each item's 

contract bytecode to protect from malicious contracts, and retrieves each item's state and trading 

history. The fetched data are stored inside a sqlite database on the user's PC, so that navigation and 

search on the market are faster and updating to each new blockchain state does not take as much 

time. BitBoost has developed a caching service for additional speed in The Block. The caching 

service stores appropriate data from the Ethereum blockchain (e.g. contract bytecode, event 

list,contract properties) inside a MySQL database and updates the database periodically.

The escrow system is provided by the listing contract itself. Funds paid by the buyer stay inside 

the contract and await confirmation from the buyer. If the buyer says YES, the money is sent to the 

seller. If the buyer says NO, the money is locked up in a disputed state. At this point, the seller 

should choose YES or NO to either send the money to the buyer or to require arbitration. If both 

parties say NO, the money is locked and a third party arbiter will choose whether to unlock the 

money to the buyer, to the seller, or to both in some ratio. The arbiter may take a percentage fee or 

a set fee from the escrowed funds for this service.

Each product for sale has a history of buys and sells, known as orders. Each order contains 

useful information about the action, timestamp, any attached encrypted message, and information 

about the message sender. Encrypted messages are decrypted automatically by the backend if the 

user is logged in and is either the buyer or the seller.

When the app loads the orders, they are grouped by the purchase order so each item may have 

multiple purchase orders and each purchase order may have multiple related orders. A purchase 

order can be understood as a buying session and it has some session-related fields attached: a 

session key for encrypted communication, a buyer's public key, a buyer's account, a purchase and a 

received payment amount, a message from the buyer with shipping info, and other useful 

information.

HTTPS

All connections are made via HTTPS: ShapeShift, image hosting, BTC/ETH/USD exchange rates, 

geth nodes, caching nodes, and any other external services.

 

HTTPS protects against Man-in-the-Middle (MitM) attacks and against traffic analyzers. HTTPS is 

a prerequisite for using Tor. MitM attacks allow the attacker to change any data received by the 

client, such as the item description. Traffic analyzers allow the attacker to identify that The Block 

platform is being used and to possibly block the traffic. Implementation: deploy HTTPS proxy on geth 

nodes, turn on HTTPS on caching servers, hardcode HTTPS URLs for external services, and filter all 

non-https image URLs.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4316T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Open Source

BitBoost intends to make The Block code open source, but not until the app is established 

enough for the network effect to protect us from competitors who may build products based on our 

code. We expect to release the code sometime in 2019. In the meantime, many questions may be 

answered simply by downloading The Block and trying it out.

3.7 TECHNICAL ROADMAP

PRIVATE ALPHA TESTING BEGINS

ALL CONNECTIONS MADE THROUGH HTTPS

ESCROW & ARBITRATION SMART CONTRACTS

UNIVERSAL SEARCH BAR

BLOCKCHAIN CACHING SYSTEM

FREE, PRIVATE IMAGE UPLOADING

UNENCRYPTED CHAT SYSTEM

x2 GETH AND CACHING NODES

DESKTOP APP FOR MAC OS, WINDOWS, 

AND LINUX PRIVATE

LOCALIZATION IN 10 LANGUAGES

MOBILE APPS FOR IOS AND ANDROID 

ALIAS SYSTEM

ERROR REPORTING SYSTEM

PUBLIC BETA TESTING

LOCALIZATION IN 20 LANGUAGES 

ERROR REPORTING SYSTEM

STATUS.IM INTEGRATION

WEB VERSION

FILTERING SYSTEM

IMPORTABLE THEME SYSTEM

SHIPPING PROVIDER INTEGRATION

PASSLFIX INTEGRATION

INTEGRATED ENCRYPTED CHAT SYSTEM

BBT PRE-SALE

MAIN SALE

APP FOR ESCROW AND ARBITRATION PROVIDERS

IMPORTABLE THEME SYSTEM

ALIAS SYSTEM

REPUTATION SYSTEM

VARIABLE AND SAFE-LOW GAS COST

LIVE DESKTOP APP

LIVE APP FOR ESCROW AND ARBITRATION PROVIDERS

LIVE STATUS.IM APP

LIVE WEB VERSION 

INTEGRATED ENCRYPTED CHAT SYSTEM

FILTERING SYSTEM

VARIABLE AND SAFE-LOW GAS COST

COMPLETE GETH AND CACHING NODE NETWORK

REPUTATION SYSTEM

MOBILE APPS FOR IOS AND ANDROID

SHIPPING PROVIDER INTEGRATION

PASSLFIX INTEGRATION

STOREFRONT SYSTEM

BULK INVENTORY UPLOAD

TOR USER PRIVACY

STOREFRONT SYSTEM

BULK INVENTORY UPLOAD

TOR USER PRIVACY

FIAT PAYMENT SYSTEM

BETA

BETA

2017

2018

TASK/DEVELOPMENT STARTS

TASK/DEVELOPMENT COMPLETED



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4317T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

4. THE LANDSCAPE

4.1 THE E-COMMERCE MARKET

The internet has radically changed the way business is done, and this change is most dramatic 

in commerce. Previously, shopping was predominantly done in person and on-site, or by using slow 

and inflexible mail-order systems. Supply was limited, too. Today, efficient e-commerce platforms 

offer a formerly unthinkable variety and transparency of goods – and reach vast customer segments, 

even if they exist in remote or under-developed areas.

Although the first online stores were rudimentary and static, offering a very poor user 

experience, online shopping gained strong momentum. The e-commerce sector is rapidly growing 

and far from mature in various respects. E-commerce came of age in the early years of the 21st 

century, but remains a high-growth sector – at least partly due to the opportunities offered by the 

proliferation of mobile devices.

 The new middle class

E-commerce mainly relied on developed markets in its early stage, but business patterns show 

a new form of consumers appearing. With disposable incomes on the rise in many emerging 

markets, the world of electronic commerce is poised to be driven by the expanding and increasingly 

wealthy new middle class. 

While internet access rates across developed markets are well above 80%, emerging markets 

have yet to catch up. Applying the same average access rate to emerging markets would lead to an 

additional 1.1 billion people who have access to e-commerce. So the industry's growth outlook 

remains very positive.

Exhibit 4: Internet penetration: Developed markets versus emerging markets

100%

0%

20%

40%

60%

80%

N
orw

ay

D
enm

ark

N
etherlands

Sw
eden

Finland

Canada

Australia

South Korea

U
K

N
ew

 Zealand

Japan

U
SA

G
erm

any

Sw
itzerland

Belgium

France

Russia

Brazil

Turkey

M
exico

South Africa

China

Indonesia

India

Credit Suisse Emerging Consumer Survey 2017

Source: www.worldinternetstats.com

http://www.worldinternetstats.com


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4318T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Ease of use

These days, online shopping can be done on smartphones and tablets, making it a proper on-

the-go activity. The «mobile-in-the-home» capacity allows consumers to literally shop anywhere and 

anytime, thanks to their Wi-Fi networks as well as untethered mobile devices. Consumers now have 

access to a wider array of products and services, more sellers, product reviews, and price 

comparisons, and can even provide their own feedback on products and services. Credit card 

processing software and payment applications such as PayPal have also made today's online 

shopping much more convenient compared to visiting a physical store.

Sector overview and statistics

E-commerce is a huge and rapidly expanding sector. In 2016 global sales for products and 

services purchased via the internet totalled approximately $1.9 trillion, representing around 8.7% of 

all retail spending. By 2020, online retail sales are expected to have grown to $4 trillion – with a 

compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of well over 20%. By that time, electronic commerce will make 

up about 14.6% of total retail sales.

 

But the most powerful market dynamics are observed in the emerging markets, where the 

share of consumers shopping online has more than doubled since 2011. China continues to 

dominate the e-commerce market while other countries such as India and Tukey are catching up. 

Online spending per capita across most of the emerging world remains well below levels seen in 

developed countries, creating good growth opportunities going forward. The Credit Suisse 2017 

Consumer Survey estimates that online «retail» spending in emerging markets may exceed $2.5 

trillion by 2025.

Globally, Asia-Pacific (APAC) continues to dominate the e-commerce market, with more than $1 

trillion in e-commerce sales in 2016. Due to the growth of the purchasing power of its emerging 

middle class, internet coverage and penetration of mobile devices, as well as improving 

infrastructure and strong internal competition, the Asian-Pacific region will see continued growth 

and will account for e-commerce sales of more than $2.7 trillion by 2020. China alone represented 

almost $900 billion in e-commerce sales in 2016 – some 47% of all worldwide online sales. The 

aggregated number of the selected countries below shows a total online retail sale above $800 

billion for 2016.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4319T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

North America constitutes a thriving part of the e-commerce market and experienced 15.6% 

growth in 2016 to top $423 billion in sales. North America will retain its position as the second 

largest e-commerce market in the coming years, with similar levels of growth forecast through 2020 

as online retail is further normalised and expands into new areas – notably the grocery market 

(witness Amazon's recently announced acquisition of the food retailer Whole Foods).

 

In Europe, 84% of individuals aged 16 to 74 had used the internet in 2016, with 66% buying 

goods or services for private use. Compared with 2007, online purchases by internet users 

increased by 16 percentage points.

Exhibit 5: Yearly online retail sales by selected country and Aggregated ($B)
4

5
0

5
8

9

7
5

2

CHINA

1
1

2
2

.5

4
4

.7

INDIA

1
7

.4

2
2

.8 2
5

.5
RUSSIA

1
3 1

5
.9

1
7

.1

BRAZIL

1
0

.2 1
3

.3 1
6

.9

MEXICO

3 4
.6 5
.6

INDONESIA

0
.3 0
.5

0
.6

SOUTH

AFRICA

5
0

4
.9

6
8

6
.6

8
6

2
.4

AGGREGATED

2014 2015 2016

40%

35%

45%

50%

55%

60%

65%

70%

2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016

Total 16-24 years 25-54 years 55-74 years

Exhibit 6: Age structure of online buyers



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4320T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

B2B (business-to-business)

The B2B market dwarfs the business-to-consumer (B2C) e-commerce market and has very 

different properties and needs. Rapidly changing distribution channel dynamics are redefining 

wholesalers' business models across a broad spectrum of product and service areas. Like 

manufacturers, wholesalers have to go beyond competing on price and availability to provide 

excellent omni-channel customer experiences. In addition, growth drivers of B2B e-commerce will 

include globalisation of procurement and cost advantages. These market factors and more are 

driving B2B e-commerce platforms. In the United States, for instance, B2B e-commerce platforms 

are expected to post double-digit growth figures through 2020.

A recent Forrester study showed that 74% of B2B buyers in the United States will research 

about half or more of their work purchases online before buying. The same study found that about 

30% will make half or more of their work purchases online today, while 56% expect to make half or 

more of their work purchases online in three years. These dynamics will eventually take hold also in 

other regions, including emerging markets, which mostly still rely on traditional channels of 

commerce.

As well as serving B2C customers, The Block will squarely target B2B e-commerce in both its 

design and its marketing, recognising that the growth of this sector represents a key opportunity for 

adoption.

1,500

0

600

900

1,200

N
etherlands

Sw
eden

Canada

Australia

South Korea

U
K

Japan

G
erm

any

France

Russia

Brazil

Turkey

M
exico

China

Indonesia

India

U
SA

Spain

Poland

Italy

300

659

146
87 80 59 21

Exhibit 7: Most recent online spending per capita (USD/year)
Source: Retailresearch, eMarketer, World Bank, Statista, Credit Suisse



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4321T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

C2C (consumer-to-consumer)

Buoyed by the success of online marketing platforms such as eBay and Taobao, online C2C 

transactions as a major e-commerce form have become popular. These platforms have made it 

extremely easy for both sellers and buyers to purchase and sell goods and services. When looking at 

China's online shopping market, the C2C segment represents a very large portion of the gross 

merchandise value (GVM), estimated at 45% in 2016. This model is being quickly replicated across 

the globe as barriers to entry are close to zero. Emerging markets have become the focus of such 

platform types, with wealthier buyers opting to choose an online B2C marketplace.

Exhibit 8: Structure of China’s online shopping 

market by GMV 2012-2019

100%

0%

20%

40%

60%

80%

6
5

.4
%

5
9

.5
%

3
4

.6
%

4
0

.4
%

4
5

.1
%

5
2

.1
%

5
5

.3
%

5
7

.6
%

5
9

.2
%

6
0

.4
%

5
4

.9
%

4
7

.9
%

4
4

.7
%

4
2

.4
%

4
0

.8
%

3
9

.6
%

2012 2013 2014 2015 2016e 2017e 2018e 2019e

Source: The data were calculated based on the financial results published by 

enterprises and interviews with experts and iResearch statistical model.

© December 2016 iResearch Global Group | www.iresearchchina.com



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4322T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Tomorrow's industry leaders might not be known today. Industry competition is often thought 

of as a continuous battle between the same set of key players. But as history shows, things are far 

more dynamic. According to R «Ray» Wang, founder of Silicon Valley-based «Constellation Research», 

52% of the Fortune 500 companies have been merged, acquired, gone bankrupt, or fallen off the list 

since 2000. The impact of digital disruption is real. However, it's not the technologies that drive this 

change. It's a shift in how new business models are created.

Global e-commerce is such a growth industry, which poses huge challenges to the world of 

traditional retail channels. For many consumers, especially in the developed world, e-commerce has 

become the top choice when it comes to shopping, threatening the existence of old brick-and 

mortar retail shops. It is also creating huge ripples in emerging markets, especially since ecommerce 

shops can enter the market quite easily.

The barriers of entry are relatively low and the initial capital requirements are small. Using the 

technology available today, e-commerce shops can acquire a reach far beyond any initial 

expectations. Many platforms operate in the market, offering similar products from a variety of 

suppliers that have little bargaining power and are looking for the widest exposure possible to 

maximize their sales potential.

Some may see market leaders such as eBay & Amazon to be bigger threats, but they are 

subject to the innovator's dilemma. Technology is changing at lightning speed these days and, in 

order to stay on top, companies must innovate. E-commerce giants are weighed down by sunk 

costs. They are deeply invested in remaining essentially as they are now, making small changes to 

retain customers. It is impractical and nearly impossible for them to innovate from the ground up, 

whereas a new company could invest everything they have into creating a product that builds on 

existing knowledge but uses only the best and latest technology. This is how small companies can 

overtake the giants, especially if they have a fresh, practical solution to an existing problem.

Enter The Block. We are about to explode onto the e-commerce scene, having worked on The 

Block itself for over two years. It would take time to catch up to us, and by that point we will be 

established with supporters using our new technology. We could also say that, since eBay, Amazon, 

and other giants co-exist in the world already, there is plenty of room for different approaches. The 

environment is only expanding.

It is relevant to note that darknet markets also exist. They provide unfiltered listings – typically 

for drugs and other illegal items –, and accept Bitcoin due to the irreversible and relatively private 

nature of Bitcoin payments. BitBoost does not encourage or condone illegal activities. A number of 

mainstream peer-to-peer markets exist, which are built on the blockchain and are more directly 

comparable to The Block. Nevertheless, there are critical differences that set The Block apart from its 

immediate competition.

4.2 COMPETITIVE ENVIRONMENT



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4323T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

From a consumer point of view, brand loyalty is limited while access to global vendors is virtually 

unlimited. Price is often the key factor when making a purchase, but other innovations such as 

payment methods and distribution channels are equally important. Today, the e-commerce industry 

is dominated by a handful of well-established enterprises. 

Their dominance varies from region to region and their business models are similar. Auction-

price and fixed-price sales are generally handled through an escrow account system, which is usually 

managed by a third party payment service provider. In summary, the exhibit below analyzes the level 

of competition in the e-commerce industry today, according to Michael E. Porter's «Five Forces 

Analysis».

Exhibit 9: E-Commerce Porter’s Five Forces Analysis

New Entrants Threat
Medium - High

Attractive growing industry

with low entry barriers

Low initial capital investment

High cost for scale competition

Customer Power
High

Access to global vendors

High price transparency

Price sensitive

Limited brand loyalty

Competitive Rivalry
High

Large established companies

Brand equity

Price, product selection

Payment Systems Innovation

Supplier Power

Tens of millions of sellers

Can list on multiple platforms

Sensitive to platform policy

changes

Substitutes Threat
Low - Medium

Offline players; shopping

malls, local markets

Direct supplier online sales

Niche product segment sales

Disruptive business models

Low



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4324T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Providers of decentralised marketplaces

There are a number of existing decentralised markets that have integrated cryptocurrencies as 

a payment system on the market. The following table attempts to compare them.

Blockchain Based

Decentralized

Open Source

Smart Contracts

Based

Cryptocurrency

Payment Option

Native token

Privacy and

Encryption

Mobile Friendly

Escrow Account

System

Fees

Third Party

Systems Integration

Product Selection

Listing Quality

Control

The Block OpenBazaar AuctionHouse Bitmarkets SafeMarket Particl Syscoin

et h e re u m et h e re u m et h e re u m

et h e re u m et h e re u m et h e re u m

bitcoin bitcoin bitcoin CASH

All types All types
Virtual goods

only
All types All types All types

All types +

submarkets

Fixed Variable Fixed

Exhibit 10: Decentralised marketplaces

OpenBazaar

One of the best-known decentralised marketplaces is OpenBazaar . [https://openbazaar.org]

OpenBazaar is an open-source application that uses bitcoins for payment and does not impose 

external fees. However, there are other «costs» involved in using OpenBazaar. There are no explicit 

fees, but OpenBazaar uses its own peer-to-peer network, rather than using the blockchain's network 

itself (The Block uses Ethereum). In order to ensure that items remain for sale, users must stay 

connected to this network, meaning the computer must stay on and connected 24/7. There are 

overhead costs involved in maintaining this connection or paying a different party to host items on 

their node. Being connected to a separate peer-to-peer system also presents security risks and 

additional vectors by which the user's privacy may be compromised.

THE

https://openbazaar.org


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4325T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

AuctionHouse

AuctionHouse  is a marketplace that also uses Ethereum. [http://auctionhouse.dappbench.com]

However, it is not designed for selling real-world goods, only on-chain, i.e. virtual, items. It is currently 

in its alpha stage of development and is not ready for a large number of users.

BitMarkets

BitMarkets  is a decentralised and anonymous marketplace [https://voluntary.net/bitmarkets]

which uses bitcoin as a payment currency. It currently only runs on macOS. BitMarkets is based on 

the BitMessage protocol, which was made for sending encrypted messages, not creating complex 

smart contracts. As a result of the limitations of a message-based system, BitMarkets has developed 

an innovative but impractical solution called «two party escrow». Rather than using third-party 

human arbiters, funds are locked up in a contract that does not release the money until both sides 

approve the sale. Each party to the sale deposits an additional sum of money equivalent to the sale 

price. All funds are effectively lost, along with the funds for the item itself, if both parties do not 

indicate they are satisfied with the sale.

SafeMarket

The closest analogue to The Block is SafeMarket , which also runs [https://safemarket.github.io]

on Ethereum and is open source. The project adopts a «submarkets» approach, with third-party 

marketplaces being managed and monetised within the overall framework provided by SafeMarket. 

It is currently in its alpha stage of development.

Particl

Like OpenBazaar, Particl  uses its own peer-to-peer network, presenting[https://particl.io]

security and privacy risks. It also requires its own native currency to do business, unlike The 

Block, which uses ether. Particl features a variation on BitMarkets' escrow contract. Instead of the 

buyer and seller both depositing the equivalent of the sale price over and above their main 

transaction, it includes an «insurance» deposit; only this insurance deposit is at stake. In the example 

given, the insurance sum on a $100 item is $80. This represents a large additional fee for buyers in 

addition to what they spend on the item in question – and there are risks involved for both parties in 

operating this way.

Syscoin

One of the oldest and most developed decentralised marketplaces is offered by Syscoin 

[http://syscoin.org] which uses its own currency and blockchain for the application. As with other 

less well-adopted altcoin platforms, the reliance on its own blockchain and internal currency are 

points of weakness, since the network is only as strong as its community. Ethereum has a much 

greater network effect, both in terms of its blockchain and currency.

http://auctionhouse.dappbench.com
http://voluntary.net/bitmarkets
https://safemarket.github.io
https://particl.io
http://syscoin.org


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4326T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

5. BUSINESS MODEL

5.1 OVERVIEW

The Block's revenue model differs fundamentally from those of traditional e-commerce 

platforms. Traditional e-commerce platforms typically charge a commission on the sale price, 

sometimes in combination with a flat fee. Buyers may also have to pay fees to PayPal or other 

payment processing solutions.

In contrast, The Block charges customers (buyers) zero fees, and merchants (sellers) are not 

charged a commission on the sale price of their products. The only costs imposed by The Block are 

payments for the service of listing an item. This takes the form of a flat fee, approximately equivalent 

to $1, which is paid in BitBoost tokens (BBT). The listing fee will be $1, regardless of the value of the 

product for sale or the number of identical items posted in a single listing. BBT will be a reusable 

ERC20 token that is freely transferable on the Ethereum blockchain and can be held within The 

Block's integrated wallet, or in an external Ethereum wallet, if preferred.

The price of BBT will vary over time, based on a number of factors:

 · Organic growth of user demand,

 · Speculative demand,

 · USD/ETH exchange rate, and

 · The cost of gas within the Ethereum network.

 

While BBT will fluctuate in value against fiat, BTC, and ETH, the listing fee within The Block will be 

regularly adjusted to track $1. For example, if BBT are each worth $0.04, then 25 BBT will be needed 

for listing an item; if BBT are worth $4, then 0.25 BBT will be needed for a listing.

SELLER

BUYERETHEREUM

ITEM
Willing to sell ITEM

Willing to buy ITEM

Listed on THE BLOCK

Purchase transaction

Listing ITEM process

Fee: ~$1

BUYER identifies

ITEM on list

ETHEREUM sent

to SELLER

Exhibit 11: Listing fee
The Block only imposes flat listing fee

No fees



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4327T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

BBT tokens can be purchased directly within the app, or from other BBT holders on external

markets (cryptocurrency exchanges, OTC, etc.). BitBoost is making these tokens available ahead of

The Block's launch at a low initial price in a crowdsale (see chapter 6.2 «The token sale structure»).

The long-term value of BBT will reflect The Block's adoption and its active user base. Early

participants who purchase BBT during the token pre-sale will receive the tokens at a steep discount,

and they will have the opportunity to participate from the start in The Block's traction and growth.

 

The price of BBT might grow through the market acceptance of the platform as an ecommerce 

solution. As The Block grows in popularity, and more merchants join the platform, higher revenues 

will allow the completion and release of new features that are already in development. This will 

further increase the appeal of the platform and lead to higher transaction volumes on The Block.

 

Once BBT have been paid as a listing fee, these tokens will be continuously recirculated into the 

market by selling them on exchanges. BitBoost needs these funds for marketing and continuous 

development. Recirculating BBT tokens at market price helps to raise their value while engaging the 

user community.

 

To explain how recirculation will work, assume a seller pays 1 USD in BBT to list an item. That 

BBT goes into a BitBoost account. At our discretion, the tokens are resold on the open market or 

through the internal wallet on The Block in exchange for ether. Any BBT holder can do the same. The 

difference is that exchanges offer more variety of payment methods. BitBoost can only accept 

payment methods that function on the Ethereum blockchain, such as ether. So, there is the 

convenience factor of buying tokens from within the app vs. the extra effort and expense of buying 

on an exchange, which offers additional currency options. The choice is up to the user. The price of 

BBT will vary depending on market value.

 

In addition to listing fees, there are small network fees which are paid directly to the Ethereum 

network during transactions between buyers and sellers. These fees are called "gas costs," meaning 

that they are necessary to fuel the Ethereum network and, thus, The Block. Due to the technical 

properties of Ethereum, the gas cost must be initially paid by buyers and sellers. However, the 

treatment of gas cost settlement is under development. It may be possible in the future for gas costs 

to be paid by a 3rd party. If this happens, it would allow BitBoost to absorb the gas costs for The 

Block through BBT revenues. Or, another option would be that sellers could offer to cover buyer's 

gas costs as a marketing tactic (e.g. a statement could be included on a seller's storefront, "Buyer 

network fees included.").



5.2 BUSINESS STRATEGY

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4328T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Regarding the business strategy, BitBoost will follow a two-stage approach. In the past, e-

commerce players such as Amazon have introduced innovative customer-to- customer (C2C) market 

solutions, disrupting the status quo. However, their success was often limited due to network effects 

and the high quality of the services offered by the incumbents. In particular, the network effect – 

large numbers of users lead to a superior utility of the platform – is the major hurdle for entering the 

e-commerce space.

The  of the business strategy will have a cryptocurrency user niche market focus:first stage

The global consumer-to-consumer (C2C) niche market is occupied by people familiar with 

cryptopayment alternatives such as bitcoins and ether. This market niche provides the ideal size to 

continue the development of the platform and to obtain support and feedback from the user base. 

As cryptocurrencies gain broader acceptance, this user base will grow and represent a truly global 

community of like-minded people. The top three cryptocurrencies have reached a market 

capitalisation of $80 billion, and their importance as a mean for capital transfers and payments has 

grown rapidly.

First phase efforts will lean toward Western Europe, Japan, South Korea, Canada, USA, Australia, 

New Zealand, and the UAE, where there is often greater user access, but individuals could come 

from anywhere. In addition to current crypto users, we plan to incentivise Power Sellers to join The 

Block as we move into the later stages of public beta. We'll offer more valuable incentives once we 

join the Live Net. This will jump start our user base and encourage buyers to follow.

Two ways we're going to do this are by offering shop templates, and the ability to upload 

complete inventories via spreadsheet import. We have also thought about offering discounts on 

listing fees, having tiers of incentives for sellers who list items in bulk. For instance, for every 100 or 

500 or 1000 listings, a seller could be rewarded with a credit of BBT. This gives Power Sellers the 

ability to list even more items. We are thinking of lots of creative ways to encourage seller adoption 

of The Block and these ideas will continue to develop over the life cycle of our product.

The  of the business strategy will focus on C2C in emerging markets:second stage

In  emerging  markets,  users  started  to  adopt  e-commerce  in  the  form  of  C2C-oriented  

models. Also  in  the  later  stages  of  development,  the  share  of  C2C  e-commerce  has remained  

significant.  In  China, for  example,  C2C  amounts  to  42%  of  the  e-commerce  market.  This  

provides  vast  opportunities.  After the  initial  penetration  of  the  crypto  niche  segment,  The  

Block  will  therefore  expand  into  the  C2C sector  in  emerging  markets.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4329T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

The market opportunity in the C2C segment in emerging markets is huge, both in terms of size

and growth rates. China is likely to remain the largest single e-commerce market (see chapter 4.1

«The e-commerce market»), already generating a sales volume of $750 billion. However, other

developing markets are growing even faster. In 2016, India, Russia, Brazil, and Mexico generated

approximately $94 billion. Since 2015, the annual growth rate of e-commerce in these countries

reached 57%, a growth trend that is expected to remain in this range as internet and mobile

coverage continue to expand. Assuming the target of a market penetration of 2%, by 2020, The

Block could generate an e-commerce volume of around $6 billion p.a. in these countries

alone.

In addition, there is great opportunity for mutually beneficial relationships in emerging markets 

all over the world by fostering an autonomous ecosystem. Not only is this interesting in terms of 

long-term strategic perspectives, but it will contribute to the longevity of the product. User 

investment in a system contributes to a more robust system.

With an emphasis on emerging and frontier markets, the BitBoost mindset lies in the eventual 

creation of a fully autonomous ecosystem centered around The Block. The goal is to overtake some 

of the regional infrastructure challenges, such as delivery, accessibility, arbitration, and payment 

escrow, by allowing those functions to be decentralized and outsourced locally. For example, a 

person owning a transportation vehicle could take on the delivery function, while a local lawyer could 

become an arbitration hub within his region.

New 'Uber-like' business models are being applied to various sectors globally where supply 

chains become more efficient when created by local market participants, rather than by external 

agents trying to adapt their standardized operations to different market dynamics. The Dabbawala 

lunch delivery service in India is a staggering example of how successful a locally-run service 

business can become over time, even if operating in a tough environment. In 2007, The New York 

Times reported that the 125-year-old dabbawala industry continues to grow at a rate of 5–10% per 

year

The Block will provide the foundation for new and existing micro-businesses to flourish within 

their home turf, allowing both buyers and sellers to benefit from low-cost, customized services while 

building local relationships. This will shape the future of The Block going forward, not only as a 

marketplace but as a third-party services platform helping local people to reach new customers and 

sell more goods. And we will do this in a decentralized way, providing the necessary tools for a 

community to run an autonomous ecosystem, based on their own requirements, commerce 

preferences, and pricing points. And, we will be happy to collaborate with communities to fully 

customize their experience.



5.3 PRODUCT PROMOTION

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4330T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Post token generation events, we have a wide-reaching plan for product promotion. Our 

mailing list, bolstered by token sale excitement, will serve as a means to keep users engaged as we 

move forward. We'll send weekly announcements regarding such things as technical updates to The 

Block, new team members, and BitBoost events. 

Our regular blog, through Medium, will include original stories written by our team for more 

detailed insights into the company. Twitter posts will  maintain a daily presence, and Twitter ads will 

raise awareness of The Block within the crypto community. We will repost YouTube reviews and 

interviews from our influencers campaign and offer new interviews with our CEO, Paul Mahone, over 

the course of beta development into public release. And, for the beta test period, we have created a 

channel on Telegram specifically for feedback, where beta testers can interact directly with each 

other and team members. Or, they can simply send an email to . feedback@bitboost.net

We also have a regular BitBoost channel on Telegram as well as a BTC Talk forum. Lastly, on our 

website, , we will be creating a public forum to post news and give the public a www.bitboost.net

voice.

Our distribution channels will offer further promotion by widening our accessibility and, thus, 

our user base. We already offer direct distribution via three downloadable, e-commerce apps for 

macOS, Windows, and Linux. We also have a web version, already in alpha, that will be embedded 

within Status.im. Status is a browser for the Ethereum ecosystem. Their goal is to be a one-stop 

shop for mobile apps that run on the Ethereum blockchain and are already gathering a huge 

community buzz. Lastly, once our Android and iPhone apps are created, they will be available on 

Google Play and the Apple app store, so we will have visibility there.

We are also open to service contracts for custom blockchain development when it aligns with 

the BitBoost mission and complements The Block. Organizations considering an e-commerce app 

built on the Ethereum blockchain can contact us.

mailto:feedback@bitboost.net
https://www.bitboost.net


5.4 FUNDS ROADMAP

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4331T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

PLATFORM
DEVELOPMENT

MARKETING AND
COMMUNICATION

LEGAL
SERVICES

BUSINESS
DEVELOPMENT

INVESTMENT ON
EMERGING MARKETS

CONTINGENCY
COSTS

$5M $10M $20M >$20M

MEMBERS: 6 MEMBERS: 8 MEMBERS: 10 MEMBERS: 12

MEMBERS: 3 MEMBERS: 5 MEMBERS: 7 MEMBERS: 10

$500,000 $700,000 $900,000 $1,200,000

$600,000 $1,200,000 $2,000,000 $2,500,000

$100,000 $150,000 $200,000 $300,000

$150,000 $300,000 $750,000 $1,000,000

$100,000 $150,000 $250,000 $400,000

$150,000 $200,000 $400,000 $500,000

Current Roadmap execution Additional Developers hiring 
focusing on front-end 
enhancement

Focus on platform v2 
back-end scalability and new 
functionality including our 
"autonomous ecosystem" 
initiative

Local presence in China with 
a representative office and 
local dedicated personnel

Deployment of SEM, Social 
Ads and inbound marketing 
starting with crypto users

European roadshow: 2-3 cities
+ SEM across Europe

Global Roadshow focusing on 
Europe, US, and China: 
~5 cities. SEM across US

Additional conferences and 
seminars in selected Emerging 
Markets: China, India, SEAsia, 
SEM across selected region

Existing Swiss legal Structure Exploration of Legal structure 
beyond current one

Partnership with overseas 
entities in selected regions

EM focus with local partners

Initial focus on Crypto users 
globally, platform feedback 
and reviews. Promotional 
program incentivising 
utilisation on a broader scale

Initial collaboration with 
dedicated large scale sellers, 
incentivization program, 
feedback and reviews

Partnership with external 
consultants focusing on the 
e-retail sector and exploring 
partnerships with existing 
e-commerce platforms

Strong effort on the Asian region 
with the help of local consultancy 
group or direct hiring

Initial focus on crypto users 
locally, and assessment on 
future penetration strategy

Reinforce our proposed 
solution on selected 
emerging markets with 
dedicated NGO partnership

"Autonomous Ecosystem" 
initiative initial deployment 
via educational marketing 
in selected cities in Emerging 
Markets

Partnership with local NGOs 
focusing on both urban and rural 
areas: multiple small events 
showing the possibilites of The 
Block as a buyer, a seller and as a 
"service job" outsourcee 

ANNUAL RATE $1,600,000 $2,700,000 $4,500,000 $5,900,000



6.1 TOKEN SUPPLY AND SPECIFICATIONS

A total of 100 million BitBoost tokens will be issued on the Ethereum blockchain using a smart 

contract. BBT will comply with the ERC20 standard and will be freely transferable on the Ethereum 

platform. These tokens will be the only BBT ever issued.

Of this total:

· 25 million BBT (25%) were available during the token pre-sale. A total of 4,862,878 BBT were

sold in this initial funding round at 0,2 USD per token. Unsold pre-sale tokens will be added to 

the main token sale.

· 41 million BBT (41%) have been reserved for the main token sale and for future token sales 

and activities (see below).

· 12 million BBT (12%) will be reserved for future contributors (see below).

· 10 million BBT (10%) will be reserved for the founding team and partners, of which 8 million 

(8%) will not be tradeable for one year.

· 5 million BBT (5%) will be reserved for early angel token owners and advisors, of which 3 

million (3%) will not be tradeable for one year.

· 5 million BBT (5%) will be reserved for existing NXT FreeMarket asset holders.

· 2 million BBT (2%) will be reserved for bounty campaigns.

6. THE TOKEN (BBT)

BitBoost's main source of initial funding will be the BitBoost token (BBT), which is used to list 

items on the decentralised e-commerce platform. BitBoost will hold a token sale to collect funds to 

finance the completion and the release of the first version of The Block.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4332T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

The role of the token in The Block

All transactions within The Block will take place in ether (ETH), using the personal wallet 

integrated in the app.

For the listing of items on The Block marketplace, BitBoost tokens (BBT) will be used. BitBoost  

tokens  do  not  indicate  ownership  of  a  company,  will  not  pay  dividends,  and  BBT holders  will  

not  earn  any  interest.  The  token  is  an  integral  part  of  The  Block's  economy,  and  its  value will  

reflect  the  degree  of  penetration  and  activity  within  the  platform.  The  more  merchants  listing 

items for  sale  on  The  Block  –  and  thus  driving  customer  adoption  –,  the  greater  the  demand  

for BBT  will  be.  Effectively,  holders  of  BBT  will  act  as  sellers  of  listing  power.  

As  The  Block's  popularity grows  and  more  merchants  join  the  platform,  new  features  will  

be  released,  which  will  further increase  the  interest  among  buyers  and  sellers.

Participants  in  the  upcoming  token  sale  have  the  opportunity  of  gaining  access  to  the 

marketplace  at  a  significantly  lower  cost  by  pre-paying  for  the  service  in  bulk,  i.e.  by  

acquiring  many tokens  in  advance.  These  early  token  owners  will  be  key  figures  for  the  

future  growth  and  operation of  The  Block.



6.2 MAIN TOKEN SALE STRUCTURE

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4333T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

As stated, 41 million BBT will be reserved for the main token sale. If part of these tokens are not 

sold during the main token sale, they will be used for future funding rounds and will be locked for a 

minimum period of one year. By that time, the platform is expected to be fully functional. The 

purpose is to maintain confidence in the project and to ensure that these tokens cannot be sold. 

This will be achieved using a smart contract or multi-signature escrow. These remaining tokens will 

be sold at a significantly higher price than the initial pre-sale tranche of 25 million and the main-sale 

tokens. They may specifically be used for:

 1. The continuous business development of the BitBoost ecosystem after the launch of The 

Block, including introducing strategic or business users, or token swaps with other blockchain and 

distributed ledger projects.

  2. Legal fees, compliance, accounting, and consultancy expenses necessary to ensure that 

BitBoost continues to operate in a lawful and commercially sound manner.

 3. Various marketing and promotional activities for BitBoost, such as media exposure, events, 

and PR.

Compensation for future contributors to The Block from the 12 million tokens reserved for this 

purpose is at the sole discretion of the founding team. Such contributors may include partnerships, 

advisors, and providers of other services.

Details about future asset sales or related joint ventures to fund the development of The 

Block's advanced features will be announced in due course. The global promotion of the platform 

will be addressed at a later time, when all features outlined on the roadmap are implemented.

Sale prices for BBT are set to USD amounts. However, tokens cannot be purchased in USD. 

Therefore, the BBT token price will be changed daily to accurately reflect the USD equivalent, using 

Bitstamp. BBT will be distributed after the end of the main sale.

During the main sale, BBT will be sold for bitcoins (BTC), ether (ETH), WAVES, and ethereum 

classic (ETC). The main token sale will last 30 days, starting on October 10th 2017 at 14:00 UTC and 

ending on November 9th 2017 at 14:00 UTC. BBT will be generated starting at 0,40 USD per token 

and will end at 0,46 USD per token, using a descending discount, as shown:

Ÿ Phase One (7 days): Tuesday, 10 Oct - 0,40 USD per BBT - 13.043% discount

Ÿ Phase Two (7 days): Tuesday, 17 Oct - 0,42 USD per BBT - 8.696% discount

Ÿ Phase Three (7 days): Tuesday, 24 Oct - 0,44 USD per BBT - 4.348% discount

Ÿ Phase Four (9 days long):Tuesday, 31 Oct - 0,46 USD per BBT - no discount



6.3 ALLOCATION OF FUNDING

All proceeds collected from the BitBoost token sale will be used to finance the continuous 

development and marketing of The Block. The approximate allocation of the funds will be as follows: 

development and operations (50%), marketing and promotion (40%), and legal contingency (10%).

Ÿ Major expenses include:

Ÿ Salaries for the BitBoost development team,

Ÿ Development outsourcing expenditure,

Ÿ Salaries for administration and other supporting staff, 

Ÿ Cost of servers, office, tools, and software,

Ÿ Marketing and promotion expenditure,

Ÿ Fees for advisors related to the project, and

Ÿ Overhead.

 

In the first phase of the project, the majority of BitBoost's costs will be related to the completion 

of the beta version with all features outlined in the roadmap, payments for caching servers, 

operations, and all infrastructure necessary for testing. Additionally, funds will be required to expand 

The Block's user base through marketing, promotion and business relationships, as well as for 

providing a legal contingency fund.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4334T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER



7. CONCLUSION

With The Block, BitBoost aims to realise the vision of a completely decentralised e-commerce 

platform, powered by Ethereum's smart contracts and cryptocurrency payments. Such a C2C 

marketplace has significant advantages over centralised platforms in terms of freedom, privacy, and 

cost. It can never be shut down, can never go offline, and listing information cannot be lost. Users 

remain private, if they wish to do so. The Block can never be censored, and users cannot be 

prevented from buying or selling. Payments are processed without the interaction – and therefore 

the costs – of centralized payment platforms.

At present, there exists no C2C e-commerce platform that provides these properties. BitBoost 

has worked on a solution to this challenge for three years, and now has a functional beta version 

that is ready for release, testing, and further development. The Block achieves a balance between 

leveraging the freedom of blockchain protocols and cryptocurrency payments, and maintaining user 

safety and security within a decentralised marketplace. This is engineered via escrow contracts, 

filters, and a reputation system.

Ease of use and accessibility are the major drivers for widespread adoption. In terms of user 

experience, The Block scores well compared to existing e-commerce platforms, offering a clean user 

interface and powerful instant-search tools. Everybody can join the marketplace, and there are no 

entry barriers. It is not necessary to be an experienced cryptocurrency user. Blockchain downloads 

are optional. ETH for customer payments and BBT for listing fees can easily be obtained from within 

The Block's integrated wallet.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4335T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER



8. THE TEAM
BitBoost is made up of a global team of highly talented members who already have experience 

in building live decentralised marketplaces.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4336T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

 Paul Mahone

 Founder and CEO

Paul, based in Lugano, Switzerland, has worked with various electronic marketplaces since 

1992. He is one of the developers of the NXT FreeMarket, and has been an entrepreneur since 

founding a micro machine company in Los Angeles in the 1990s. He served as a Director for 

Molecular Robotics, the first nanotechnology company listed on Nasdaq. Paul is a specialist in 

Node.js, Angular, SQL, and user interface design. Paul's employment history includes the Japanese 

government, Harvard University, and the University of Southern California. Paul is a graduate of 

Harvard University, and he holds two master's degrees.

 Andrew Lekar

 Founder and lead developer, back-end

Andrew, based in Chelyabinsk, Russia, is an expert blockchain developer, with extensive 

experience in both the Ethereum and NXT blockchains. He is a specialist in C/C++, Java, JavaScript, 

Erlang, databases, encryption, and security. He is one of the developers of the NXT FreeMarket, a 

decentralized marketplace built on the NXT blockchain. Andrew has built all the Ethereum smart 

contracts that power The Block, and has created an open-source, ring signature-based mixing 

contract for Ethereum. He holds a master's degree in Computer Science from South Ural State 

University.

 Samuele Maran

 Founder and CFO

Based in Padua, Italy, Samuele is an experienced project manager and financial expert. He is in 

charge of customer relations. Being the responsible IT-builder for large residential property projects, 

he has vast experience in managing all bank, customer, and community relations as well as 

coordinating complex projects and heterogeneous teams. Samuele is a graduate of the Ca' Foscari 

University of Venice. He holds a master's degree in Business Administration and is a certified 

accountant.

 Tori Arcuri

 Director of operations

Tori has been a business owner and consultant for 20 years, specializing in branding and 

logistics. At BitBoost, she will work to ensure operations efficiency and effectiveness, developing 

BitBoost into a thriving business, and putting into practice our mission to redefine e-commence. Tori 

is a blockchain enthusiast and believes innovations like The Block will contribute to a fair and vibrant 

future for us all.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4337T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

 Álvaro Rodriguez

 Director of marketing

Álvaro is a digital strategy and e-commerce specialist. A native of Spain and based in 

Switzerland, Álvaro holds a Ph.D from University of Santiago di Compostela and an MBA from ESIC. 

He brings years of digital communication experience to the BitBoost team.

 Alessandro Tozzi

 Community manager and start-up advisor

Alessandro is Technology Transfer Director for the Boston Entrepreneurship Center (BEC) and 

oversees projects technology transfer and implementation for several young startups, including 

spin-offs of the engineering department of BEC. He manages the marketing activities and public 

relations of BEC with social organizations and academic institutions in Europe and the USA. 

Alessandro is also a project manager, entrepreneur, and blockchain enthusiast. He has served as 

advisor and staff member in successful blockchain projects.

 Maksim Sergeev

 Lead developer, front-end apps

Max is a MEAN stack expert based in Moscow, and is highly proficient in the technologies 

behind The Block, including Angular 2, TypeScript, Node.js, and Electron. His skills in user experience 

and user interface design give The Block its unique and distinctive look. Max has already successfully 

completed a large number of challenging projects and is continuously expanding his impressive 

skills.

 

 Dmitry Petrov

 Developer, front-end desktop apps

Dmitry is a meticulous and passionate developer, fluent in over a dozen languages including 

Node.js, Javascript, and Angular. He began in front-end development, then moved on to full stack, 

and now assists with coding The Block for macOS, Windows, and Linux apps. He's very interested in 

blockchain technology and is excited by all the possible applications. Dmitry lives in Moscow, and 

speaks both Russian and English.

 Moshe Malka

 Developer, mobile & web apps

Moshe is a software engineer and blockchain enthusiast based in New York. He is a seasoned 

MEAN stack developer who designs, develops, and integrates cutting-edge frameworks using 

Javascript and Python. Moshe applies his deep knowledge of dynamic web projects to The Block, 

integrating our app with Status.im, a mobile Ethereum OS. Through his efforts, The Block will be 

made available to more users. Moshe speaks English, Hebrew, and Spanish.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4338T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

 Riccardo Scanavacca

 iOS developer

Riccardo is a mobile app developer based in London, and is building the iOS version of The 

Block. A self-taught programmer and keen technologist, he strongly believes the future will rely on 

distributed ledger technology and its various applications. When he is not developing new ideas and 

opportunities, he works on internal iOS apps for the BBC.

 Eva Fernández Arias

 Social Media Manager - Twitter

Eva has worked as a Social Media Manager and Content Creator for more than 5 years, as a 

part of various agencies and media. Now, she is our Twitter account manager, creating content and 

posting daily to keep our supporters up on all the latest cryptocurrency, blockchain, and BitBoost 

news. Eva helps our users stay informed and connected to the changing world! She also assists with 

customer support.

 Andrea Greco

 Webmaster

Andrea is knowledgeable in all aspects of web design and engineering, having been a web 

developer for over 9 years. He is proficient in HTML5, CSS3, JS, and PHP. But, Andrea is not only 

valued for his tech skills. He studied modern languages and then worked in tourism in both Ireland 

and Italy. He speaks Italian, English, and Spanish, and currently lives in Thailand. This love of world 

cultures, combined with his work ethic and knowledge base, makes Andrea an ideal fit for BitBoost.

 Yessin Schiegg

 Advisor

Yessin is a financial, legal, and regulatory expert, and has served as an compliance advisor to 

the Ethereum Foundation. Based in Switzerland, he possesses a broad network in the crypto 

ecosystem. He is the CFO of Alpha Associates AG, an independent private equity manager and 

advisor based in Zurich, Switzerland. He widely promotes blockchain technology and believes its 

applications will serve society globally. His skills are start-up advisory, private equity, and finance. 

Yessin holds a master's degree in Finance from the University of St. Gallen. Moreover, he is a Swiss 

Certified Public Accountant and holds the CFA and CAIA charters.

 Tommaso Bonanata

 Advisor

Tomasso is a seasoned profesional in the fields of Market Analysis and Financial Engineering, 

He brings his professional know-how from the traditional financial markets. He worked as an Equity 

Fund Manager for Julius Baer and GAM for over 9 years, focusing on Emerging and Frontier regions. 

His passion for Digital Assets and Blockchain Technology started in late 2013; today he is a full-time 

investor and advisor in the crypto space, bridging the gap between the legacy and digital worlds.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4339T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

 Ian Scarffe

 Advisor

Ian's experiences in the business world have allowed him valuable insight into every working 

aspect of an organization and the minds of millions of customers. His outstanding entrepreneurial 

and commercial acumen, his entrepreneurial innovation and motivation, the capacity to work at 

strategic levels, interpersonal, communication and negotiation skills, his passion for customer 

service, wealth of knowledge, and vast amounts of hands on experience in almost every role will 

prove to be valuable assets for BitBoost.

 Carlos M. Parada

 Advisor

Carlos is a multifaceted blockchain evangelist and designer who embodies a variety of skills, 

from architectural drawing and visualization to 3D digital prototyping, website/app design, UI/UX 

development, etc. and owner of  studio. He has collaborated with international BEYOND VISUALS

renowned brands including Hilton Hotels Group and Kompas Gramedia. In the crypto scene he's 

known for developing the front-end of the first superNET and Waves platform Lite Client versions as 

well as their initial branding among many others.

https://beyondvisuals.com


9. DISCLAIMER
This document is for informational purposes only and does not constitute an offer or 

solicitation to sell shares or securities in BitBoost, The Block, or any related or associated company. 

Any such offer or solicitation will be made only by means of a confidential offering 

memorandum and in accordance with the terms of all applicable securities and other laws. 

None of the information or analyses presented are intended to form the basis for any 

investment decision, and no specific recommendations are intended. Accordingly this document 

does not constitute investment advice or counsel or solicitation for investment in any security. 

This document does not constitute or form part of, and should not be construed as, any offer 

for sale or subscription of, or any invitation to offer to buy or subscribe for, any securities, nor 

should it or any part of it form the basis of, or be relied on in any connection with, any contract or 

commitment whatsoever. 

BitBoost expressly disclaims any and all responsibility for any direct or consequential loss or 

damage of any kind whatsoever arising directly or indirectly from: (i) reliance on any information 

contained in this document, (ii) any error, omission, or inaccuracy in any such information or (iii) any 

action resulting therefrom.

 

Risk disclosures will be made available at  prior to the beginning https://www.bitboost.net/legal/

of the token sale.

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4340T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

https://www.bitboost.net/legal/
https://www.bitboost.net/legal/


ANNEX

INTERNET, BLOCKCHAIN AND ETHEREUM

Without doubt, the internet has revolutionized how humans live, communicate, think, and shop 

– how they live their everyday lives. It has turned their very existence upside down. Today, most 

humans take the internet for granted and cannot even imagine their lives without it. The internet 

was born nearly five decades ago, and since then, technology has rapidly advanced by huge leaps. 

About 15 years ago, only 12% of all people owned mobile phones. Now, more than six out of ten 

persons worldwide use a mobile phone. About 15 years ago, one third of the population in 

developing countries lived in extreme poverty, compared to less than 15% today. Facebook, which 

now has nearly 1.5 billion users, had not even been launched then. In another fifteen years' time, 

who knows how much technological innovation and developments society will see, and what 

changes this will bring?

Cryptocurrencies offer a fundamentally different way of approaching money and conducting 

online commerce. The development of blockchain-based money solves a number of problems 

inherent in the current financial system. While it is not a panacea, a properly implemented e-

commerce platform with integrated cryptocurrency payments has extensive advantages.

Bitcoin

The first cryptocurrency was the bitcoin. Articulated in , Satoshi Nakamoto's 2008 white paper

Bitcoin deals with the «double spending» problem through the use of a shared ledger that is 

maintained by a large number of network nodes. By contriving a system in which it is 

computationally expensive to add a block of transactions to the ledger, but easy for anyone to verify 

it, Bitcoin makes it unlikely for any member of the network to succeed in submitting a fraudulent 

transaction – and it is expensive to try to do so. Thus miners – those tasked with upholding the 

security of the network – are better off acting honestly and maintaining the integrity of the ledger.

Financial independence

Nakamoto's implementation of his white paper effectively removed the need for a trusted third 

party to act as a middleman in online transfers. This enabled real peer-to-peer monetary 

transactions online for the first time ever: a remarkable breakthrough, and a task that many experts 

had believed could not be achieved. Money, which had been centralised for millennia in seigniorage, 

and for decades in terms of the payment system, could once again become purely a tool of 

commerce rather than a way to extract value and exert control. Because Bitcoin transactions take 

place directly – from sender to recipient, and without the involvement of a centralised third party – 

they cannot be censored. Once a transaction has been accepted into the ledger, there is no way of 

reversing it. This has a simple but powerful implication: if you want to send someone money, you 

can. There is no authority that can block or reverse the transfer. Bitcoin's financial system restores 

full autonomy to its users. 

w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4341T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4342T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Low-cost transfers

Because Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies use a blockchain to secure transactions, there are 

no middlemen to keep accounts, and therefore, there are no single entities that can charge fees for 

the service. Miners collectively process transactions and are rewarded for verifying a block with both 

new coins (block rewards, currently set at 12.5 Bitcoins per block) and the smaller fees incurred with 

each transfer. Unlike the legacy banking system, Bitcoin does not recognise geographical borders. 

Transferring funds to a neighbour on the other side of the road is as fast and efficient as sending 

money to the other side of the world. While banks and remittance services tend to charge significant 

flat fees as well as unfavourable exchange rates between currencies, Bitcoin's fees are fixed and low 

by comparison. Other blockchain protocols tend to charge even lower fees.

Privacy

Bitcoin's use of a shared ledger to facilitate peer-to-peer transactions also has implications for 

privacy. The Bitcoin ledger is fully transparent by design, meaning that anyone can trace transactions 

from one address to another, right back to the block in which the coins were first created. However, 

because addresses are essentially strings of random alphanumeric characters, it is not inherently 

obvious to whom the address belongs. Bitcoin is, strictly speaking, pseudonymous rather than 

anonymous. While data may be leaked in a variety of ways that associate a Bitcoin address with 

other personal information to reveal the owner's identity, by using best practices it is possible to use 

Bitcoin privately. The lack of a trusted intermediary means that no information needs to be 

registered to use a Bitcoin wallet. There is no administrative authority to control transactions or to 

collect user data.

Ethereum

Bitcoin offers a huge leap forward in the fields of online financial privacy and independence, but 

it is limited in its scope. Bitcoin does one thing very well: it transfers value securely. Although Bitcoin 

is the largest cryptocurrency, adoption has been limited, and a large part of the ecosystem's 

economic activity is accounted for by roles that support the currency itself, such as mining and 

trading. Relatively few merchants have taken the step of integrating Bitcoin payments. This is partly 

because they do not believe the disadvantages of the status quo are grave enough to switch to 

something viewed as experimental, that still has a significant technical overhead, and partly because 

a broad user base does not exist yet. Bitcoin has been adopted on the dark web, where its relative 

privacy and freedom from intervention have made it the currency of choice for online drug markets. 

However, Bitcoin only addresses one side of the e-commerce transaction: the buyer's. Online stores 

require the involvement of a third party, which holds a database of products, merchant information, 

and transaction histories – with all the coupled risks for privacy.

The Ethereum platform has the potential to disrupt e-commerce at least as extensively as 

Bitcoin has, and probably much more dramatically. While BTC acts as an ideal medium of transfer, 

Ethereum opens up the possibility of a computer that performs operations across its global network 

[https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/White-Paper]. This has the potential to decentralise not only 

the means of payment, but also the infrastructure for the e-commerce platform itself.

https://ethereum.org
https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/White-Paper


w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sPAG E /4343T H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

Smart contracts

Developed by the Ethereum foundation, a Swiss non-profit organisation, Ethereum upends the 

traditional approach to offering services on the internet. Instead of building server farms across the 

world – staffing them, maintaining them, and securing them – Ethereum makes it possible to build a 

global computing infrastructure by using a type of coding called «smart contracts». These contracts 

allocate computing resources across the blockchain and reward those who use their own hardware 

to support the calculations required. With the right skill and hardware, anyone can join this effort by 

creating an Ethereum node and be compensated for their contribution, all without a central 

coordination authority. Ethereum works in a fully decentralised manner, just as the Bitcoin 

blockchain does. Smart contracts are pieces of code, whose execution is ensured by the network as 

a whole, in the same way that Bitcoin's transfers and records of funds are policed by the whole 

network. This means that applications that run automatically can be built, and the reliability of the 

services they offer is guaranteed because there is no single point of failure.

Ethereum's smart contracts therefore offer the possibility of an e-commerce platform that has 

unique properties: privacy for both the buyer and the seller, complete freedom from censorship and 

interference, and very low fees for users.



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sEX H IB ITST H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

LIST OF EXHIBITS
EXHIBIT 1: The financially excluded

EXHIBIT 2: Data flow

EXHIBIT 3: Schematic AES structure

EXHIBIT 4: Internet penetration

EXHIBIT 5: Online retail sales

EXHIBIT 6: Age structure of online buyers

EXHIBIT 7: Online spending per capita

EXHIBIT 8: Structure of China’s online shopping market

EXHIBIT 9: E-commerce Porter’s five forces analysis

EXHIBIT 10: Desentralized marketplaces

EXHIBIT 11: Listing fee

............................................................................................................  5

.....................................................................................................................................  12

........................................................................................................  13

................................................................................................................  16

.....................................................................................................................  18

.............................................................................................  18

...................................................................................................  19

...................................................................  20

..........................................................................  22

...............................................................................................  23

.................................................................................................................................  25



w w w . w a v e s p l a t f o r m . c o m 1 / 6b r a n d g u i d e l i n e sw a v e sR EFER EN C EST H E  BLOC K  |  WH IT E  PAPER

REFERENCES
https://shapeshift.io

http://imgur.com

https://cr.yp.to/ecdh/curve25519-20060209.pdf

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Advanced_Encryption_Standard

https://github.com/kvhnuke/etherwallet/blob/mercury/app/scripts/myetherwallet.js

https://www.tutorialspoint.com/cryptography/advanced_encryption_standard.htm

https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf

www.ethereum.org

https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/White-Paper

https://www.fundresearch.de/sites/default/files/partnercenter/Credit-

Suisse/News_2017/emerging-consumer-survey-2017.pdf

https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-

Trillion-This-Year/1014369

https://www.technavio.com/report/global-media-and-entertainment-services-global-e-

commerce-market-2016-2020

http://ec.europa.eu/eurostat/statistics-explained/index.php/E-

commerce_statistics_for_individuals

https://www.forrester.com/The+B2B+eCommerce+Playbook+For+2017/-/E-PLA370

http://unctad.org/meetings/en/Presentation/dtl_eweek2016_AlibabaResearch_en.pdf

http://documents.worldbank.org/curated/en/187761468179367706/pdf/WPS7255.pdf#page=

3

https://www.accenture.com/t20160830T101949__w__/cn-en/_acnmedia/PDF-29/Accenture-

Cross-Border-Ecommerce.pdf

http://www.google.ch/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=3&cad=rja&uact=8&ved=0

ahUKEwjfra6u2MHTAhVLJsAKHSAEBm8QFggyMAI&url=http%3A%2F%2Fkauppa.fi%2Feng%2Fconte

nt%2Fdownload%2F90692%2F1159578%2Ffile%2FC2C%2520e-

commerce%25202015.pdf&usg=AFQjCNH-QUfOTiegcH0-tysZJQSEetPFDw

http://unctad.org/en/PublicationsLibrary/tn_unctad_ict4d06_en.pdf

http://www.groundswell.fi/sim/academic/(sim)%20From%20B2C%20to%20C2C%20e-

commerce.pdf

https://www.ecommercewiki.org/wikis/www.ecommercewiki.org/images/4/42/Brazil_B2C_E-

commerce_Report.pdf

http://www.nielsen.com/content/dam/nielsenglobal/de/docs/Nielsen%20Global%20Connected

%20Commerce%20Report%20January%202017.pdf

https://www.statista.com/markets/413/topic/983/c2c-e-commerce/

https://www.statista.com/statistics/281542/ebays-annual-net-income/

https://openbazaar.org

http://auctionhouse.dappbench.com

https://voluntary.net/bitmarkets

https://safemarket.github.io

https://particl.io

http://syscoin.org

https://shapeshift.io
http://imgur.com/
https://cr.yp.to/ecdh/curve25519-20060209.pdf
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Advanced_Encryption_Standard
https://github.com/kvhnuke/etherwallet/blob/mercury/app/scripts/myetherwallet.js
https://www.tutorialspoint.com/cryptography/advanced_encryption_standard.htm
https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf
http://www.ethereum.org/
https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/White-Paper
https://www.fundresearch.de/sites/default/files/partnercenter/Credit-Suisse/News_2017/emerging-consumer-survey-2017.pdf
https://www.fundresearch.de/sites/default/files/partnercenter/Credit-Suisse/News_2017/emerging-consumer-survey-2017.pdf
https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-Trillion-This-Year/1014369
https://www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-Trillion-This-Year/1014369
https://www.technavio.com/report/global-media-and-entertainment-services-global-e-commerce-market-2016-2020
https://www.technavio.com/report/global-media-and-entertainment-services-global-e-commerce-market-2016-2020
http://ec.europa.eu/eurostat/statistics-explained/index.php/E-commerce_statistics_for_individuals
http://ec.europa.eu/eurostat/statistics-explained/index.php/E-commerce_statistics_for_individuals
https://www.forrester.com/The+B2B+eCommerce+Playbook+For+2017/-/E-PLA370
http://unctad.org/meetings/en/Presentation/dtl_eweek2016_AlibabaResearch_en.pdf
http://documents.worldbank.org/curated/en/187761468179367706/pdf/WPS7255.pdf#page=3
http://documents.worldbank.org/curated/en/187761468179367706/pdf/WPS7255.pdf#page=3
https://www.accenture.com/t20160830T101949__w__/cn-en/_acnmedia/PDF-29/Accenture-Cross-Border-Ecommerce.pdf
https://www.accenture.com/t20160830T101949__w__/cn-en/_acnmedia/PDF-29/Accenture-Cross-Border-Ecommerce.pdf
http://www.google.ch/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=3&cad=rja&uact=8&ved=0ahUKEwjfra6u2MHTAhVLJsAKHSAEBm8QFggyMAI&url=http%3A%2F%2Fkauppa.fi%2Feng%2Fcontent%2Fdownload%2F90692%2F1159578%2Ffile%2FC2C%2520e-commerce%25202015.pdf&usg=AFQjCNH-QUfOTiegcH0-tysZJQSEetPFDw
http://www.google.ch/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=3&cad=rja&uact=8&ved=0ahUKEwjfra6u2MHTAhVLJsAKHSAEBm8QFggyMAI&url=http%3A%2F%2Fkauppa.fi%2Feng%2Fcontent%2Fdownload%2F90692%2F1159578%2Ffile%2FC2C%2520e-commerce%25202015.pdf&usg=AFQjCNH-QUfOTiegcH0-tysZJQSEetPFDw
http://www.google.ch/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=3&cad=rja&uact=8&ved=0ahUKEwjfra6u2MHTAhVLJsAKHSAEBm8QFggyMAI&url=http%3A%2F%2Fkauppa.fi%2Feng%2Fcontent%2Fdownload%2F90692%2F1159578%2Ffile%2FC2C%2520e-commerce%25202015.pdf&usg=AFQjCNH-QUfOTiegcH0-tysZJQSEetPFDw
http://www.google.ch/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=3&cad=rja&uact=8&ved=0ahUKEwjfra6u2MHTAhVLJsAKHSAEBm8QFggyMAI&url=http%3A%2F%2Fkauppa.fi%2Feng%2Fcontent%2Fdownload%2F90692%2F1159578%2Ffile%2FC2C%2520e-commerce%25202015.pdf&usg=AFQjCNH-QUfOTiegcH0-tysZJQSEetPFDw
http://unctad.org/en/PublicationsLibrary/tn_unctad_ict4d06_en.pdf
http://www.groundswell.fi/sim/academic/%28sim%29%20From%20B2C%20to%20C2C%20e-commerce.pdf
http://www.groundswell.fi/sim/academic/%28sim%29%20From%20B2C%20to%20C2C%20e-commerce.pdf
https://www.ecommercewiki.org/wikis/www.ecommercewiki.org/images/4/42/Brazil_B2C_E-commerce_Report.pdf
https://www.ecommercewiki.org/wikis/www.ecommercewiki.org/images/4/42/Brazil_B2C_E-commerce_Report.pdf
http://www.nielsen.com/content/dam/nielsenglobal/de/docs/Nielsen%20Global%20Connected%20Commerce%20Report%20January%202017.pdf
http://www.nielsen.com/content/dam/nielsenglobal/de/docs/Nielsen%20Global%20Connected%20Commerce%20Report%20January%202017.pdf
https://www.statista.com/markets/413/topic/983/c2c-e-commerce/
https://www.statista.com/statistics/281542/ebays-annual-net-income/
https://openbazaar.org/
http://auctionhouse.dappbench.com/
https://voluntary.net/bitmarkets
https://safemarket.github.io/
https://particl.io/
http://syscoin.org/


THE BLOCK | WHITE PAPER


	Page 1
	Page 2
	Page 3
	1.0
	1.0

	Page 4
	2.0
	2.0
	2.1
	2.1

	Page 5
	2.2
	2.2

	Page 6
	Page 7
	Page 8
	3.0
	3.0
	3.1
	3.1

	Page 9
	3.2
	3.2

	Page 10
	ESCROW AND ARBITRATION
	3.3
	3.3

	Page 11
	OTHER KEY FEATURES
	3.4
	3.4

	Page 12
	Page 13
	NOT ANOTHER DARKNET MARKET
	3.4
	3.4

	Page 14
	Page 15
	3.5
	3.5

	Page 16
	Page 17
	Page 18
	TECHNICAL ROADMAP
	3.5
	3.5

	Page 19
	4.0
	4.0
	4.1
	4.1

	Page 20
	Page 21
	Page 22
	Page 23
	Page 24
	Page 25
	Page 26
	Page 27
	Page 28
	4.0
	4.0
	4.1
	4.1

	Page 29
	Page 30
	4.2
	4.2

	Page 31
	Page 32
	4.2
	4.2

	Page 33
	4.2
	4.2

	Page 34
	TOKEN SUPPLY AND SPECIFICATIONS
	5.1
	5.1
	5.0
	5.0
	TOKEN SUPPLY AND SPECIFICATIONS

	Page 35
	MAIN TOKEN SALE STRUCTURE
	5.2
	5.2

	Page 36
	5.3
	5.3

	Page 37
	Page 38
	7.0
	7.0

	Page 39
	Page 40
	Page 41
	Page 42
	8.0
	8.0

	Page 43
	ANNEX
	ANNEX
	A1
	A1

	Page 44
	Page 45
	Page 46
	EXHIBITS
	EXHIBITS

	Page 47
	REFERENCES
	REFERENCES

	Page 48

